Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1460DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1460DP (4) 91
sb/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 455B.104, subsection 4, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
4. By December 31 of each year, the department shall submit
a report to the governor and the general assembly regarding
the greenhouse gas emissions in the state during the previous
calendar year and forecasting trends in such emissions that
occurred during the two calendar years prior to the current
calendar year. The first submission by the department shall
be filed by December 31, 2011, for the calendar year beginning
January 1, 2010. If completed, the publication of an annual
statewide greenhouse gas inventory for the state by the United
States environmental protection agency shall satisfy this
requirement.
Sec. 2. Section 455B.133B, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. The air emission fee account shall include all fees
established by the commission to be imposed and collected by
the department for emission fees for regulated pollutants
submitted by major sources as defined in section 502 of the
federal Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §7661, and
as defined in 567 IAC ch. 22 by the commission by rule pursuant
to section 455B.133.
Sec. 3. Section 455B.133B, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. The operating permit application fee account shall
include all fees established by the commission to be imposed
and collected by the department for accepting applications
for operating permits submitted by major sources as defined
in section 502 of the federal Clean Air Act Amendments of
1990, 42 U.S.C. §7661, and as defined in 567 IAC ch. 22 by the
commission by rule pursuant to section 455B.133.
Sec. 4. Section 455B.304, subsection 12, Code 2025, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 5. REPEAL. Section 455B.152, Code 2025, is repealed.